Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 22 Miscellaneous Rules

31-22-1.
Unattended vehicles.

No person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle shall permit it to stand unattended without first stopping the engine, locking the ignition, removing the key from the vehicle, and effectively setting the brake and, when standing upon any grade, turning the front wheels to the curb or side of the highway. However, the provision for removing the key from the vehicle shall not require the removal of keys hidden from sight about the vehicle for convenience or emergency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-1

; P.L. 1977, ch. 117, § 1.

31-22-2.
Restrictions on backing.

The driver of a vehicle shall not back the vehicle unless the movement can be made with reasonable safety and without interfering with other traffic. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-2

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 119.

31-22-3.
Riding on motorcycles.

A person operating a motorcycle shall ride only upon the permanent and regular seat attached to it. The operator shall not carry any other person nor shall any other person ride on a motorcycle unless the motorcycle is designed to carry more than one person, in which event a passenger may ride upon the permanent and regular seat if designed for two (2) persons, or upon another seat firmly attached to the rear or side of the operator.

In no event shall a motorcycle passenger ride in front of the operator. An operator violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a civil violation and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-3

; P.L. 1983, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 10.

31-22-3.1.
Riding on motor driven cycles — Passengers prohibited.

A person operating a motor driven cycle as defined in § 31-3-1(i) shall ride only upon the permanent and regular seat attached to it. The operator shall not carry any other person. An operator violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a civil violation and upon conviction shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second or subsequent offenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 10.

31-22-4.
Overloading of vehicles.

No person shall drive a vehicle when it is so loaded, or when there are in the front seat such a number of persons, exceeding three (3), as to obstruct the view of the driver to the front or sides of the vehicle or as to interfere with the driver’s control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

No passenger in a vehicle shall ride in any position as to interfere with the driver’s view ahead or to the sides, or to interfere with the driver’s control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-4

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 119.

31-22-5.
Safety zones.

No vehicle shall at any time be driven through or within a safety zone. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-5

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 119.

31-22-6.
Coasting prohibited.

The driver of any motor vehicle when traveling upon a down grade shall not coast with the gears of the vehicle in neutral.

The driver of a commercial motor vehicle, when traveling upon a down grade, shall not coast with the clutch disengaged.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-6

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 119.

31-22-7.
Following fire apparatus.

The driver of any vehicle other than one on official business, shall not follow any fire apparatus traveling in response to a fire alarm closer than five hundred feet (500´), or drive into or park the vehicle within the block where fire apparatus has stopped in answer to a fire alarm. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-7

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 119.

31-22-8.
Crossing fire hose.

No vehicle shall be driven over any unprotected hose of a fire department when it is laid down on any street, or private driveway to be used at any fire or alarm of fire, without the consent of the fire department official in command. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-8

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 119.

31-22-9.
Throwing debris on highway — Snow removal.

No person shall throw or deposit upon any highway any glass bottle, glass, nails, tacks, wire, cans, or any other substance likely to injure any person, animal, or vehicle upon the highway, or likely to deface the beauty or cleanliness of the highway, nor shall any person in removing snow from any driveway, public or private, leave the snow in any condition so as to constitute a hazard on the highway.

The director of transportation shall post signs advising the public of penalties for throwing debris on the highways.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 106, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 119; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 18; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 18.

31-22-10.
Regulation as to school buses.

The division of motor vehicles is authorized to adopt any rules and regulations that it may deem necessary for the safety and protection of school children concerning the type, construction, and equipment of motor vehicles primarily used for the transportation of children to and from schools, to and from child care facilities licensed by the department of children, youth and families, and to and from school sponsored activities including athletics and extra-curricular activities, and the operation of them. It may from time to time alter, rescind, or add to the rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-10

; P.L. 1987, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 514, § 1.

31-22-10.1.
Insurance for school buses.

Every owner of a school bus or other mass transit vehicle registered with the division of motor vehicles of this state shall insure the vehicle against loss from liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the vehicle in minimum amounts of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per person and three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) per accident. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall not permit the vehicle to be registered until satisfactory proof of the existence of a policy of insurance providing the coverage required in conformity with the provisions of this section is furnished.

The term “mass transit vehicle” for the purposes of this section means and includes any motor vehicle with a capacity of ten (10) or more persons which is primarily for the transportation of minors.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any motor vehicle owned by the Rhode Island public transit authority pursuant to chapter 18 of title 39.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 218, § 1.

31-22-11.
Inspection of school buses.

The division of motor vehicles shall inspect or cause to be inspected all school buses used for the transportation of school children as defined in §

31-1-3(aa)

at least twice throughout the year. Both of the inspections are to be done at a state certified facility on a semiannual scheduled basis. These inspections will be known as tear down inspections that will include pulling wheels at least once each year if the school bus is equipped with drum brakes and any other work deemed necessary by the state employed or state certified inspectors. Reports of the inspections shall be made in writing and shall be filed with the inspection division of the department of revenue, and the reports shall be available at no cost for public inspection during usual business hours of the division. In the event that a school bus does not pass an inspection and a re-inspection is required, the division of motor vehicles shall impose a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for each re-inspection.

Upon receipt of the report, the inspection division shall immediately forward a copy to the registered owner and to the superintendent and school committee of the school district for which the school bus transports children.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-11

; P.L. 1968, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 16; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 18; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 18; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 21, § 14.

31-22-11.1.
Enforcement of inspections of school buses.

Failure of a school bus to appear for a scheduled inspection shall result in that school bus registration being immediately suspended. Notification of the failure to appear and the suspension order shall be sent to the registered owner and to the superintendent and the school committee of the district for which the bus transports children.

Failure of a school bus to pass any inspection shall result in written notice to the registered owner to bring the bus into compliance within five (5) days or face suspension of the school bus registration. Notification of the failure of the bus to pass inspection shall also be sent to the superintendent and the school department for which the bus transports children.

The suspensions shall remain in effect until the time that the bus passes inspection. No school bus will be used to transport children after failing an inspection until the time it is brought into compliance and passes inspection. Notification that a bus has passed inspection shall be sent to the registered owner, the school superintendent, and the school committee for which the bus transports children.

The division of motor vehicles is authorized to enact such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary to enforce this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 344, § 2.

31-22-11.2.
Maintenance of school buses.

All school buses, as defined in §

31-1-3

, shall be maintained in a safe operating condition through an approved systematic preventive maintenance program. Defects which could create a hazard for riders or other road users shall be corrected before the vehicle transports children.

The maintenance program shall be adequate to provide the proper care of all the equipment owned, leased, or contracted, and a written record shall be kept for all repairs conducted on each bus. The records shall be retained for the life of each vehicle and shall transfer with the vehicle when sold, and the record shall be available for inspection by the director of inspections during normal business hours. Included in these records shall be a record of any torque pressure as recommended by the manufacturer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 144, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 16; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 15.

31-22-11.3.
Random inspection of school buses.

The division of motor vehicles, and state and local law enforcement officers, are authorized to stop and conduct a visual inspection of any school bus as defined in

31-1-3

, on public roads and highways and in public and private parking areas. The random inspections shall be conducted at a time when no school children are on the school bus. Nothing in this section shall preclude a law enforcement officer from stopping a school bus which is transporting children for any visible violation of applicable safety standards. Whenever a law enforcement officer stops a school bus, he or she shall verify that the vehicle identification number (VIN) listed on the registration card is the same as the VIN listed on the body of the bus.

Any federal or state employee authorized to stop and inspect trucks on the highways or roads of this state is authorized to conduct inspections of any school bus.

Any school bus found to be in violation of applicable laws and/or regulations may be immediately impounded, and notification shall be sent to the registered owner, the school superintendent and the school committee for which the bus transports children. The bus shall not be used to transport children until the violation is cured and the bus is inspected by a state employed or state certified inspector.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 344, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 16.

31-22-11.4.
School bus drivers pre-trip inspection.

Every school bus driver shall perform a daily pre-trip inspection of his or her assigned vehicle, and shall report promptly and in writing any defect or deficiencies discovered that may affect the safety of the vehicle’s operation or result in mechanical breakdown. Pre-trip inspection and condition reports for school vehicles subject to the motor carrier safety regulations of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration (“FMCSA”) as may be amended from time to time shall be performed in accordance with those regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 344, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 4.

31-22-11.5.
Use of school bus with suspended registration — Penalty.

No registered owner, school superintendent, or driver shall use or allow to be used any school bus for transporting children after notification that the bus registration has been suspended for failure to appear for its scheduled inspection or for failure to pass the inspection. The registered owner of the bus shall be fined an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each day the bus is used to transport children in violation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 344, § 2.

31-22-11.6.
Childcare vehicles and school extracurricular vehicles.

Pursuant to §

31-22-10

, the division of motor vehicles is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations concerning the type, construction, and equipment of motor vehicles used for the transportation of children to and from childcare facilities and to and from school sponsored activities including athletics and extracurricular activities.

For the purposes of this section, “school bus,” as referred to in §

31-1-3

, is defined as a vehicle which is used to carry children to or from school on school bound routes at the outset of the children’s school day and/or on home bound routes at the end of the children’s school day. For these routes, a school bus or a pupil transportation vehicle as set forth in §§

31-22.1-1

and

31-22.1-2

must be used regardless of the number of students being transported.

For purposes of this section, “school extracurricular vehicles” is defined as vehicles designed to transport fewer than fifteen (15) students to and from school sponsored activities including athletics, internships, work experiences, and extracurricular activities where school buses are not used because of the small number of students being transported.

For the purpose of this section, “childcare vehicle” is defined as a motor vehicle owned or leased by a licensed child daycare center as defined in subdivisions

42-72.1-2(6)

and

42-72.1-2(11)

, that does not exceed fifteen (15) passengers and is being used to transport children from schools to childcare facilities and/or from childcare facilities to schools or other activities of the child daycare center. Two (2) door sedans shall not be considered childcare vehicles or school extracurricular vehicles.

For the purposes of this section, a “Family childcare home vehicle” is defined as a motor vehicle owned or leased by a family daycare home provider as defined in subdivision

42-72.1-2(10)

or an assistant to that licensed provider, that does not exceed fifteen (15) passengers and is used to transport children from schools to the family childcare home and/or from the childcare home to schools or to other activities of the childcare home.

The division of motor vehicles shall have the authority to suspend the registration of any vehicle used for childcare transportation or school extracurricular transportation that does not meet the following requirements:

Seating. Adequate seating space for all passengers shall be provided. The maximum seating capacity of a childcare vehicle and school extracurricular vehicle shall be fifteen (15) persons, including the driver. No standing shall be permitted while the vehicle is in operation.

Safety belts. Safety belts shall be required for all passengers riding in the childcare vehicle and school extracurricular vehicle.

Vehicle registration. All childcare vehicles and school extracurricular vehicles shall be registered as public vehicles.

Vehicle inspection. All childcare vehicles and school extracurricular vehicles shall be inspected for excessive emissions and/or safety items according to a staggered appointment schedule as determined by the director of revenue, or his or her designee, and from time to time thereafter as may be required, and the vehicle owner shall display upon the vehicle the certificate of inspection and approval issued to the vehicle until the certificate shall expire.

Inspector’s rejection notice. The director of revenue, or his or her designee, may affix a notice of rejection to any vehicle that fails to pass the required inspection requirements. The rejection notice shall not be destroyed or removed from the vehicle until the vehicle has passed the inspection requirements, or its removal has been authorized by the director of revenue or his or her designee.

Vehicle identification. Any and all childcare vehicles and school extracurricular vehicles must have the name of the childcare organization conspicuously placed on the side of the vehicle. The identification shall be required to possess two inch (2") letters, and be permanently affixed on the side of the vehicle. Family childcare home vehicles shall be exempt from the vehicle identification requirements of this section.

Should any childcare vehicle and school extracurricular vehicle be a leased vehicle, the vehicle shall forego the requirement of having the name of the childcare facility or school permanently affixed to the side of the vehicle, but instead may satisfy the identification requirement by placing a magnetized sign naming the childcare facility or school or any other temporarily affixed apparatus; provided, that the temporary identification sign not be interchanged, replaced, or modified to change the purpose or function of the childcare vehicle and school extracurricular vehicle.

Fire extinguisher. The childcare vehicle and school extracurricular vehicle shall be equipped with at least one pressurized, potassium bicarbonate base dry chemical-type fire extinguisher, mounted in the manufacturer’s extinguisher bracket, and located in the driver’s compartment in full view of and readily accessible to the driver. A pressure gauge shall be mounted on the extinguisher so as to be easily read without removing the extinguisher from its mounted position.

The fire extinguisher shall have a minimum capacity of not less than two and a half pounds (21/2 lbs.) and be of a type approved by the Underwriters Laboratories, Inc., with a rating of not less than ten (10) B:C. The operating mechanism shall be sealed with a type of seal that will not interfere with use of the fire extinguisher.

First-aid, airway, and bodily fluid spill kits. Every childcare vehicle, family childcare home vehicle and school extracurricular vehicle shall be equipped with a first-aid kit mounted in an area accessible to the operator which consists of bandages, sterile pads, adhesive tape, and Band-Aids, for use in the administration of first-aid treatment. In addition, every childcare vehicle, family childcare home vehicle and school extracurricular vehicle shall be equipped with a bodily fluid spill kit and every childcare vehicle and school extracurricular vehicle shall be equipped with an approved emergency airway kit.

Each childcare center vehicle and school extracurricular vehicle shall also have an audible door alarm and an audible back up alarm.

All persons operating a pupil transportation vehicle to convey children shall hold a Rhode Island chauffeur’s license and shall have passed a written test as may be prescribed by the department of motor vehicles. In addition, all such persons who operate a pupil transportation vehicle to convey children shall submit to a national and statewide criminal and driving record background check by the hiring agency.

School extracurricular vehicles purchased after January 1, 2000, shall further comply with regulations which the division of motor vehicles is authorized to promulgate which require these vehicles to meet appropriate safety standards. The additional safety requirements of this subsection shall, effective January 1, 2008, also apply to school extracurricular vehicles in service prior to January 1, 2000, which are still in service after January 1, 2008.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 514, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 16; P.L. 2007, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 207, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 18; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 18; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 10, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 345, § 1.

31-22-11.6.1.
Childcare vehicles and school extracurricular vehicles — COVID-19. [Effective for 2021-2022 school year.]

Notwithstanding §

31-22-11.6

, or any general law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, effective March 28, 2022, due to the public health crisis caused by COVID-19, the requirement of using designated types of vehicles for specified routes as contained in §

31-22-11.6(a)(2)(i)

is hereby suspended for student transportation providers (“Providers”) retained by or via the Rhode Island department of education (“RIDE”) to provide student transportation services. For such routes, retained providers may utilize:

School buses, as defined in §

31-1-3(aa)

;

Pupil transportation vehicles, as defined in §

31-22.1-1

;

School extracurricular vehicles, as defined in §

31-22-11.6(a)(2)(ii)

;

Childcare vehicles, as defined in §

31-22-11.6(a)(2)(iii)

; and

Family childcare home vehicles, as defined in § 31-22- 11.6(a)(2)(iv).

Vehicles authorized pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to transport students shall also be in compliance with the applicable laws, rules, and regulations related to student transportation vehicles and shall:

Carry a sign on the school bus visible from the front and back of the vehicle containing the lettering required by §

31-20-11

;

Be equipped with Type I Class A turn signal lamps, which shall have a four-way hazard warning signal switch to cause simultaneous flashing of the turn signal lamps which may be activated when the vehicle is approaching a stop to load or discharge school students and when needed as a vehicular traffic hazard warning. Each vehicle shall also be equipped with front and rear alternating flashing school bus red signal lamps, which shall remain flashing when school pupils are entering or leaving the vehicle; and

Be equipped with one pair of adequate chock blocks and three (3) flares in compliance with United States Motor Vehicle D.O.T. Safety Standard No. 125.

The prohibition against school extracurricular vehicles from having amber or red flashing lights as contained in

280-RICR-30-15-8.5(B)(1)

is hereby suspended.

Retained providers may utilize student transportation vehicles currently registered in Massachusetts or Connecticut to provide student transportation services in Rhode Island; provided that:

Each student transportation vehicle has current, valid Massachusetts or Connecticut registration and inspection stickers;

Each student transportation vehicle is covered by an insurance policy meeting the requirements of §

31-22-10.1

;

The Rhode Island department of education has verified compliance of subsections (d)(1) and (d)(2) of this section; and

The retained provider complies with the registration requirement for each student transportation vehicle pursuant to §

31-7-2

by the sunset date of this section.

The license requirements contained in §§

31-10-5

,

31-22.1-3(10)

, and

31-22-11.6(b)(10)

are hereby suspended for drivers currently licensed in Massachusetts or Connecticut to operate student transportation vehicles and employed by retained providers pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and furthermore, the provider driver may operate student transportation vehicles appropriate for their licensure; provided that:

As applicable, the provider driver possesses a current, valid Massachusetts or Connecticut commercial driver’s license with a “P” and “S” endorsement and a current, valid Massachusetts school bus certificate if licensed in Massachusetts.

As applicable, the provider driver possesses a current, valid Massachusetts or Connecticut driver’s license that is the equivalent of a Rhode Island license with the appropriate endorsement(s) allowing the transportation of school children.

RIDE has verified compliance with subsections (e)(1) and (e)(2) of this section.

As applicable, the provider driver obtains a school bus certificate governed by

280-RICR-30-05-2

prior to the sunset of this section.

As applicable, the provider driver obtains a pupil transportation certificate governed by

280-RICR-30-05-5

prior to the sunset of this section.

The provider driver complies with license requirements under §§

31-10-5

,

31-22.1-3(10)

, and

31-22-11.6(b)(10)

prior to the date of sunset of this section.

Unless extended by the general assembly, this section shall sunset upon the conclusion of the 2021-2022 school year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 7, § 4, effective March 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 8, § 4, effective March 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 234, art. 2, § 11, effective June 28, 2022.

31-22-11.7.
Unauthorized school bus entry.

Any person over eighteen (18) years of age who enters a school bus as defined in §

31-1-3

without prior authorization of the driver or a school official, and who refuses to disembark after being ordered to do so by the driver, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

A school district may place a notice at the entrance of the school bus that warns against the unauthorized entry or refusal to disembark prohibited by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 16; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 15.

31-22-11.8.
Unauthorized use of personal wireless communication devices on a school bus.

The use of a personal wireless communications device by a school bus driver shall be prohibited, while the bus is transporting children, except in the case of an emergency.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

For a subsequent conviction under this section, a person shall be punished by a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

For a third or subsequent conviction under this section a person shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars ($200).

If any civil action is brought as a result of a violation of this section, the violation shall be evidence of negligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 1.

31-22-11.9.
Use of personal wireless communications devices by minors while operating motor vehicles is prohibited.

The use of a personal wireless communication device by a minor, while the minor is operating a motor vehicle shall be prohibited, except in the case of an emergency. For purposes of this section, the term “minor” shall include any person less than eighteen (18) years of age.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

For a second conviction under this section, a person shall be punished by a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

For a third or subsequent conviction, a person shall be punished by a fine of two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) and/or loss of license until the user reaches his/her eighteenth (18th) birthday.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 313, § 1.

31-22-12.
Supervision and inspection of vehicles transporting passengers for hire.

The division of motor vehicles shall have jurisdiction over the lighting, equipment, safety, and sanitary condition of all taxicabs, buses, jitneys, and other vehicles used for the transportation of passengers for hire, and shall cause an inspection of them to be made before registering the vehicles and from time to time thereafter as it shall deem necessary for the convenience, protection, and safety of passengers and the public.

A fee of two dollars ($2.00) shall be paid to the division of motor vehicles for each inspection as required by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 33, § 11; P.L. 1954, ch. 3275, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-22-12

.

31-22-13.
Abandoned vehicles.

The last registered owner, or person having custody and control as authorized by the owner, of any motor vehicle who abandons it as defined by §

31-42-1

on any public or private property other than his or her own, without the permission of the owner or lessee of the property in cases of private property, shall be liable for all costs and expenses incurred by the owner, lessee, or the state or any municipality in the removal of the vehicle from public or private property. Failure to pay the expenses within thirty (30) days of written notice shall be punished by a fine upon conviction, not in excess of two hundred dollars ($200). Upon conviction the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall be notified and shall suspend the license and registration of the last registered owner of the abandoned vehicle until these expenses are paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 445, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 401, § 2.

31-22-14.
Towing — Costs paid by owner.

The owner, or person having custody and control as authorized by the owner, of any motor vehicle which is towed away from any public roadway because it is in violation of a state law or city or town ordinance, or which is towed from the scene of an accident or breakdown, or which is towed as the result of the lawful detention of an unlicensed operator, including those operating after denial, suspension, or revocation of license, shall be liable for the cost of towing, storage, and other incidental expenses in connection with the towing.

The owner or operator of this section shall be responsible for the towing, storage and incidental expenses and for the towing or transportation fees to a demolisher or crusher and any crushing preparation fees associated with gas tanks, auto fluff, and battery acid and tire removal which exceed the salvage value of the vehicle.

Any owner or operator who should fail to pay the costs and expenses set forth in this section within thirty (30) days of the receipt of written notice from the tow company, police department or demolisher shall be punished by a fine upon conviction not in excess of two hundred dollars ($200).

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 445, § 1.

31-22-14.1.
Towing — Accident scene.

Every licensed wrecker who shall render towing services at the scene of an accident shall also have the responsibility to remove all glass and debris at the accident scene from the roadway at the time of rendering the services. A police officer shall remain on the scene of the accident until the licensed wrecker has cleared the roadway from auto debris in accordance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 234, § 1.

31-22-15.
Lien for towing and storage charges.

Every licensed wrecker who shall render towing and storage services for the benefit of a motor vehicle owner shall have a lien on and may retain the possession of the motor vehicle until the charges for the towing and storage have been paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 161, § 1.

31-22-16.
Sale to enforce lien.

If the charges referred to in §

31-22-15

remain unpaid for a period of at least sixty (60) days from and after the towing, the wrecker may sell the motor vehicle at private or public sale and the proceeds, after first paying the expenses of the sale, shall be applied as follows:

In payment of the wrecker’s lien;

In satisfaction of any indebtedness secured by a financing statement filed with the secretary of state;

In satisfaction of any indebtedness secured by any subordinate security interest if written satisfaction of demand for it is received before distribution of the proceeds is completed;

After payment of any or all of the above sections, the proceeds if any, shall be paid to the registered owner, if known to the wrecker.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 161, § 1.

31-22-17.
Notice of sale.

Thirty (30) days before any sale pursuant to §

31-22-16

is held, notice in writing shall be given to the registered owner of the motor vehicle to be sold, if known to the wrecker, and to the holder of any security interest recorded with the secretary of state, of the amount owed for the storage and towing, and the time and place of sale. The notice shall be mailed, registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, to the address of the registered owner on file at the division of motor vehicles, or the last known address of the owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 161, § 1.

31-22-18.
Newspaper advertisement of sale.

Every licensed wrecker, after giving notice to the registered owner of the motor vehicle to be sold as prescribed in §

31-22-17

, shall advertise notice of the sale for two (2) consecutive days at least ten (10) days but not more than fourteen (14) days prior to the date of the sale, in a daily newspaper of general circulation, the following information:

A general description of the motor vehicle to be sold, including its make, model, year, color, and motor or serial number;

The name and address of the registered owner and the license plate number, if known, to the wrecker; and

The place and date of the proposed sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 161, § 1.

31-22-19.
House trailers.

No person or persons shall occupy or otherwise be a passenger in a house trailer at any time while the house trailer is in transit or being moved in any manner upon the public highways of this state.

Any person found guilty of violating any of the provisions of this section shall be fined fifteen dollars ($15.00) for each offense.

For the purposes of this section, a “house trailer” is defined as a trailer or a semi-trailer which is designed, constructed, and equipped as a dwelling place, living abode, or sleeping place, either temporary or permanent and which is equipped for or capable of use as a conveyance on streets and highways.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

31-22-19

; P.L. 1969, ch. 172, § 1.

31-22-20.
Solicitation on roadways, permit required.

No person shall distribute literature to, request donations from, or in any other manner perform acts of solicitation of any type directed at the operator or any passenger of any motor vehicle in a travel lane, including motor vehicles stopped at intersections or in obedience to any traffic control device, or on any public street or highways within the state, without first obtaining from the city or town council of the municipality involved a permit to conduct the solicitation. Solicitation without a permit, or in violation of the terms and conditions of a permit, shall be subject to the penalties provided for by the city’s or town’s applicable code or ordinance for violations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 290, § 1.

31-22-21.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 238, § 1; and P.L. 1984, ch. 121, §§ 1, 2; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 382, § 1.

31-22-21.1.
Presence of alcoholic beverages while operating or riding in a motor vehicle.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle upon the public highways with any unsealed alcoholic beverage container within the passenger section of the vehicle.

Any person found in violation of this section may be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or have his or her driver’s license suspended for up to six (6) months, or both, for the first violation, and for each subsequent violation may be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or have his or her driver’s license suspended for up to one year, or both.

The operator of a rented limousine or bus shall not be subject to the provisions of this section provided neither the operator nor any passenger under the age of twenty-one (21) is in possession of any unsealed alcoholic beverage container.

The original jurisdiction of this section shall be exclusively in the traffic tribunal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 382, § 2.